Utah statutes.
32A-6-302 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Operational restrictions.
In addition to the restrictions, conditions, and requirements of Section
32A-6-105, each industrial or manufacturing use permit is subject to the
following operating restrictions:
(1)  An industrial or manufacturer permittee may produce for lawful use and
sale the following:
(a)  vinegar;
(b)  preserved nonintoxicating cider;
(c)  food preparations;
(d)  a United States Pharmacopoeia or national formulary preparation in
conformity with Title 58, Chapters 17b, 37, 37a, 37b, and 37c, if the
preparation:
(i)  conforms to standards established by:
(A)  the Department of Agriculture and Food; and
(B)  the Department of Health; and
(ii)  contains no more alcohol than is necessary to preserve or extract the
medicinal, flavoring, or perfumed properties of the treated substances; and
(e)  wood and denatured alcohol if manufactured in compliance with the
formulas and regulations under Title 27, Code of Federal Regulations, Parts
19, 20, and 21.
(2) (a)  An industrial or manufacturer permittee that produces patent or
proprietary medicines containing alcohol may sell the medicines in the
original and unbroken package if the medicine contains sufficient medication
to prevent its use as an alcoholic beverage.
(b)  An industrial or manufacturer permittee described in this Subsection (2)
shall, upon request by the department, provide a sufficient sample of the
medicine to enable the department to have the medicine analyzed for purposes
of this section.
